Terms
Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
Cookie List RTL.lu
Configure your preferences
Terms of use
Version of 31.10.2020
1. Acceptation of the Terms of Use
Welcome to RTL Luxembourg's Internet portal. The services are provided to you on the condition that you respect these terms of use (hereinafter referred to as the “Terms of Use”), which we may modify from time to time. You are therefore advised to regularly refer to the latest version of the Terms of Use, which are permanently available at the following address:
https://privacy-center.rtl.lu/en#terms
In addition, the use of certain RTL Luxembourg services may require compliance with additional and specific rules or guidelines which will be indicated in a specific charter to be found on the site. These rules and guidelines are deemed to form an integral part of the Terms of Use.
It is specified that RTL Luxembourg may offer other services for which specific conditions of use must be accepted prior to any use.
2. Description of the Service
RTL Luxembourg currently provides its users with a wide range of online services including, in particular, personalised content and RTL-branded programmes available on its network of services (hereinafter collectively referred to as the “Service”).
Unless expressly provided otherwise, any new feature that enhances or augments several existing services or any new service launched by RTL will be subject to these Terms of Use.
You are aware and accept the fact that the Service is provided to you “as is” and that RTL cannot be held responsible for the opportunity, deletion or failure to store personalized user communications.
In order to use the Service, you need Internet access, either directly or through systems with access to content provided on the Internet, it being specified that any corresponding costs are your sole responsibility. In addition, you must have all the necessary equipment, including a computer, tablet or smartphone, a modem or any other connection tool, in order to ensure this connection to the Internet network. You should be aware that, in certain areas of the Service, content is reserved for adults and access thereto is therefore restricted to users aged 18 and older.
3. Obligation to register
By using the Service you agree to:
Provide true, accurate, current and complete information about yourself as requested in the Service registration form (such information being hereinafter referred to as the “Registration Data”), and
Maintain and regularly update the Registration Data to keep it true, accurate, current and complete. In the event that you provide false, inaccurate, out-of-date or incomplete information, RTL shall be entitled to suspend or terminate your account and refuse you access to all or part of the Service immediately and for the future.
RTL is concerned about respecting the safety and privacy of its users, particularly children and young people under the age of 16. For this reason, parents are invited to watch their children's use of Internet access and to bear in mind that the Service is designed to reach a wide audience and that as legal guardians it is the responsibility of parents to determine which Service is or is not appropriate for their child(ren) and to watch their use thereof.
4. RTL’s privacy policy
The Registration Data and possibly other information about you are subject to RTL's Privacy Policy in accordance with Regulation (EU) 2016/679 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 27 April 2016 on the protection of individuals with regard to the processing of personal data and on the free movement of such data and repealing Directive 95/46/EC (General Data Protection Regulation).
In addition, it should be noted that according to the General Data Protection Regulation, you have the right to access, modify and erase any personal data that RTL has received.
RTL makes every effort to protect your data. Your data is protected against loss, destruction, falsification or manipulation as well as against unauthorised access of any kind and/or nature.
The data collected during registration will only be passed on to the various partners if the player is among the winner(s) and has given his/her consent.
Nevertheless, RTL reserves the right to contact you if RTL needs your help and/or your testimony in the context of a television or radio report. However, your anonymity will be guaranteed in accordance with the provisions of the law on the protection of journalists' sources (“Quelleschutz”).
5. User Account, Password and Security
At the end of the registration process, you will define an account name and a password. You are solely responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your account and password and for any actions that may be taken with your account and/or password. You commit yourself to:
Immediately notify RTL of any unauthorized use of your account and/or password and/or any breach of security, and
Make sure that at the end of each session you explicitly log out. RTL shall not be liable for any loss or damage arising from a breach of the obligations in this paragraph 5.
6. Users’ responsibility
You are aware that you alone, and not RTL, are responsible for viewing all information, data, texts, software, music, sounds, photographs, images, videos, messages or any other material (hereinafter collectively referred to as the “Content”).
You acknowledge that the Content has not been sent to you but that it is your own conscious and informed choice to access it. You undertake to consult this server only in a personal capacity, without involving a private company or a public body in any way whatsoever and without exploiting the Content in a commercial or non-commercial manner.
Consequently, you are aware that you alone assume full and complete responsibility if one or more of the above-mentioned commitments and declarations should prove to be incorrect.
7. Specific recommendation to international users
Given the global nature of the Internet, you agree to comply with all rules applicable in the country where you view the Content, to the behaviour of users of the network and the eligible Content. In particular, you agree to comply with the laws applicable when transferring data from Luxembourg or the country in which you reside.
8. Interdiction to resell the Service
You may not reproduce, copy, sell, resell, or exploit for any commercial purpose whatsoever any part of the Service, any use of the Service, or any right to access the Service.
9. General rules for use and storage
You acknowledge that RTL may establish general rules and limits to the use of the Service, including, but not limited to, setting a maximum number of times you may access a Service during a given period (as well as the maximum duration of each access).
You acknowledge that RTL will be free to delete any account that remains unused for a certain time period and that RTL is free to modify these general rules at any time, which is why RTL recommends that you refer to them regularly.
10. Modification of the Service
RTL reserves the right to modify, temporarily or permanently interrupt at any time all or part of the Service without having to inform you in advance. RTL cannot be held liable to you or to any third party for any modification, suspension or interruption of the Service.
11. Termination
You acknowledge that RTL has the right to terminate all or part of the access right corresponding to your password, or even to delete your account and password, as well as the right to remove or move any Content on the Service for any reason, in particular due to lack of use, or if RTL has good reason to believe that you have violated or acted contrary to the letter or spirit of these Terms of Use.
RTL may also unilaterally interrupt the provision of the Service at any time. You acknowledge that any termination of your access to the Service pursuant to the terms hereof may take place without prior notice, and you acknowledge and agree that RTL shall be entitled to deactivate or delete your account at any time and with immediate effect and/or prohibit any further access to the Services. Furthermore, you acknowledge that RTL shall not be liable to you or to any third party for any termination of your access to the Service.
12. Relationship with advertisers
Your correspondence, business relationship with advertisers or participation in promotions offered by advertisers found by or through the Service, including payment and delivery of goods or services, or any other terms, conditions, warranties or representations associated with such dealings, directly takes place between you and the advertiser.
Consequently, you acknowledge that RTL cannot be held liable for any loss or damage whatsoever arising from this relationship or, more generally, from the presence of advertisers on the Service.
13. RTL’s property right
You acknowledge and agree that the Service and any software necessarily used in connection with the Service (hereinafter referred to as “Software”) may contain confidential information that is protected by applicable intellectual property law or any other law.
You also acknowledge that you are aware that the Content included in sponsored advertising and information presented to you via the Service or by advertisers are protected by copyright, trademark, patent or other laws. Unless expressly authorised to do so by RTL or the advertiser, you undertake not to modify, rent, borrow, sell, distribute or create derivative works based in whole or in part on the Service or the Software.
RTL grants you, in a personal capacity, the non-exclusive and non-transferable right to use the Software; it being specified that you are prohibited (and that you may not grant authorisation to others) from copying, modifying, creating a derivative work, reversing the design or assembly or in any other way attempting to find the source code, selling, attributing, sub-licensing or transferring in any way whatsoever any right relating to the Software. You undertake not to modify the Software in any way or to use modified versions of the Software and in particular (without this list being exhaustive) with a view to obtaining unauthorised access to the Service. You agree not to access the Service via any interface other than the interface provided to you by RTL for this purpose.
With regard to your contributions to the RTL Forum, you grant us for the duration of the protection of the underlying intellectual property rights, the world-wide, non-exclusive, royalty-free rights to make use of all or part of these contributions, to reproduce, modify, shorten, publish, translate, distribute, disseminate, display the contributions in media such as radio and television, to make them available on demand via the Internet/world wide web, to incorporate these contributions into other works and to further assign the rights granted hereunder to third parties.
14. Guarantees
a) Your use of the Service is at your own risk. The Service is provided to you on an “as is” basis and is accessible according to its availability. RTL does not provide any express or implicit guarantee in this respect, including but not limited to guarantees relating to the quality and compatibility of the Service for a specific use and to the non-violation of the rules of use of the Service by its users.
b) RTL does not guarantee that:
The Service will perfectly meet your expectations,
The Service will be uninterrupted (or accessible), timely, secure or error-free,
The results that can be obtained using the Service will be accurate and reliable,
The quality of any products, services, information or other material obtained by you through the Service will meet your expectations, and
Defects in the software used, if any, will be corrected.
c) Any material downloaded or otherwise obtained through the use of the Service is at your own risk.
d) No advice or information, whether oral or written, obtained by you from RTL or during the use of the Service may create guarantees not expressly provided for in this agreement.
15. Limitation of liability
You acknowledge and agree that, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, RTL shall not be liable for any direct or indirect damage, including but not limited to loss of profits, customers, data or any other loss of intangible assets (even if RTL has been informed of the potential for such damage) that may occur:
From the use or, on the contrary, the impossibility of to use the Service,
From costs that may arise as a result of the acquisition of substitute goods or services resulting from the purchase of goods or services or from transactions occurring while using the Service,
As a result of unauthorised access to the Service by a user or modification of your own data,
From any other issue related to the Service.
16. Notifications
Any notification may be sent to you by e-mail or by post. RTL also reserves the right to modify these Terms of Use of the Service by placing notices of changes or links to such notices directly on the Service.
17. Information relating to registered trademarks
rtl.lu; the RTL logo, the graphic presentation of the site, the games, the complementary radio and television services, as well as any other material (images, photos, texts, sounds, videos, messages, etc.) (hereinafter collectively referred to as the “RTL Trademarks”) are registered trademarks owned by RTL.
Without the express authorisation of RTL, you undertake not to use or distribute the RTL Trademarks in any way whatsoever.
18. Intellectual property rights
RTL respects third parties’ intellectual property rights and asks its users to do the same. If you have good reason to believe that your data has been used in a way that may infringe your rights as recognised by the European legislation in force, please inform RTL about intellectual property by providing us with the following information:
The electronic or “physical” signature of the person authorised to act on behalf of the holder of the data,
A description of the work you consider to have been violated,
The location on the site of the material that was the subject of the dispute,
A declaration on your honour in which you acknowledge that you are not aware that the use has been authorised by the holder or his representative,
A declaration on honour, which may lead to penalties and prosecution for perjury, acknowledging that the information corresponding to the points listed above is accurate and that you are the rightful owner or authorised to represent him/her.
19. Right to information
If you have any questions regarding the protection or processing of your data, please consult our data protection policy or contact us at the following address:
privacy@rtl.lu
20. OneSignal
RTL uses in its applications a “Push” messaging platform from OneSignal, Inc.
This platform supports the sending of short messages to applications. In this respect, the reception preferences and a unique identifier for the application itself are saved during the use of this service.
21. SMS “Premium” games
RTL draws the attention of all participants to its games to the fact that participation SMS messages may be charged at a higher rate than the rate for a regular SMS message. RTL therefore urges all participants to exercise caution and moderation in the frequency of SMS messages sent. RTL reserves the right to limit the number of SMS messages that a participant may send and/or to exclude SMS messages from any participant beyond a number of messages set by RTL in a non-discriminatory manner. Participation in such games is restricted to persons aged 16 or older.
Any person who has not won may request reimbursement of the costs of sending the participation SMS message up to a maximum of €0.50 per SMS. Only messages sent during the time when the game was running and participation was open will be taken into consideration. In order to request reimbursement, you must present yourself at RTL's head office, during office hours (working days between 09.00 and 17.00) with proof of your sending (in the elements sent from the telephone and/or the corresponding invoice identifying the SMS message(s) concerned from your mobile service provider. When refunding the costs, RTL will request the signature of a refund receipt and the deletion of the proof of sending on the telephone. No reimbursement may be made later than 15 working days after the end of the game concerned.
22. Games and contests
Employees of CLT-UFA, RTL Group, CLT-UFA International, BCE, ENEX, Media Assurances, IP as well as their direct family members (ascendants, descendants) are excluded from participation in the games and contests organised on the stations of RTL, RTL Radio Lëtzebuerg, RTL Télé Lëtzebuerg and RTL.lu.
Winnings
RTL reserves the right, within the framework of its games and actions, whether commercial or not, to replace any advertised gift with a prize of equivalent value. If RTL is unable to provide the advertised gift for any reason whatsoever, RTL cannot be held liable thereof. No consideration or financial equivalent may be claimed by the winner.
RTL or its partners will be responsible for forwarding the prizes to the winners within a period of 3 (three) months from the closing date of the games and actions.
RTL reserves the right to publish the names of the winners, without being obliged to do so.
In the event of dispatch, RTL cannot be held liable for any damage, theft or loss occurring during the delivery of the prizes.
Each prize returned after it has been sent by post, e-mail or any other form of dispatch to the winner and which is not claimed within the following month will be lost to the participant.
Likewise, any prize to be withdrawn that is not claimed by the winner within 1 (one) month will be definitively lost and this without any challenge or possible claim by the winner.
24. Photos of events on our sites
If you are in a photo published on our sites and you would like to request its deletion, please send a message to privacy@rtl.lu with your name, email address, reason and the direct address to the photo in question on our site.
After checking the admissibility of your request, our services will proceed, within a reasonable time period, to delete the photo from our site. However, we cannot guarantee that the photo in question has been included on another site or media outside of RTL products.
25. Applicable law and jurisdiction
By using our Websites, you agree that all of their content shall be exclusively governed by and interpreted in accordance with Luxembourg law. The Luxembourg courts shall have exclusive jurisdiction in the event of any dispute relating to these Sites or their use.
26. Discrepancies
These Terms of Use are published in both French and English versions. In case of discrepancies between the French and English versions, the French version prevails
Charter for users of the RTL internet portal discussion forums
The present charter contains the mandatory rules of conduct to which all participation in the RTL Forum is subject, regardless of the subject of discussion, the permanent or non-permanent or moderated or unmoderated nature of the forum(s) or chat room(s) concerned.
This Forum constitutes a single entry point to one or more discussion forums and chat rooms or other discussion and exchange applications.
These terms of use may be specified for participation in applications that are part of the Forum, such as chat rooms or blogs.
Access and registration
This Forum can be read by anyone. In order to contribute to it, you will be asked to register by entering your name or by choosing a pseudonym (if you prefer to be identified in this way to other participants) and to enter an e-mail address.
The email address you must provide must be a valid and unique email address owned by the user. A registration with a “disposable” / “temporary” email address will result in the refusal of any publication of your comments.
This registration allows :
Other participants to acknowledge your various contributions, thus personalizing the debate without revealing your real identity,
- any participant to contact you personally without revealing your e-mail address.
RTL reserves the right to take exclusionary measures with immediate, temporary or permanent effect with regard to any participant in the Forum or any of its applications, when, in the sole opinion of RTL, the participant breaches the rules of the Forum or reports behaviour of such a nature as to endanger the serenity of communications on the Forum or the rules governing it. RTL further reserves the right to take legal action or to join in any action to enforce the rules governing this Forum or to obtain compensation for damage caused by a breach of these rules.
Rights and obligations of the reader
Any reader of this Forum must respect the intellectual property rights as well as the personal rights of the contributors. In particular, he or she cannot reproduce and disseminate the contributions published on this Forum on other forums or other media without the consent of their contributors.
Any reader may nevertheless reproduce the content of this Forum for private consultation purposes or reproduce and disseminate short excerpts of a message, for information or research purposes, by quoting the name of this Forum and of the contributor of the message (real name or pseudonym).
He or she will not denigrate, in any other forum, the contents or contributions published on the Forum or by any of the contributors in any form whatsoever. He or she will not reveal the identity of any of the participants in the Forum and of which he or she has become aware by any means whatsoever, except at the express request of the moderator or host of the Forum or with the permission of the person concerned.
Rights and obligations of the contributor
Each contributor remains the owner of his message and the intellectual property rights attached thereto. However, should you decide to unsubscribe from the Forum for any reason whatsoever, the possible deletion of your messages is left to the sole discretion of the moderator or host of the Forum, without this discretion being interpreted as an appropriation of your messages by the moderator or host.
The comments made on this Forum are nevertheless published under the sole responsibility of their authors. As such, you must respect the laws and regulations in force and the rights of persons. For example, you must not disseminate messages that are violent, insulting, defamatory, racist, revisionist, advocating war crimes, paedophiles, calling for murder or inciting suicide, inciting discrimination or hatred or whose content would reproduce without authorization a work protected by intellectual property (e.g. press articles, message from a third party).
In this respect, neither a possible a priori or a posteriori moderation, nor the deletion of messages whatever the reason nor their modification may be interpreted as an appropriation by RTL of the terms or contents of the message(s) concerned by these measures. At no time will RTL assume any editorial responsibility with regard to the content published within the framework of the Forum.
Please ensure that the courtesy necessary for the smooth running of the debates is respected.
Moderation
This Forum is moderated a priori i.e. all messages are read before publication. A delay may therefore elapse before a message is made public.
The moderator ensures that your contribution is relevant to the topic of debate in the Forum, complies with the laws and regulations in force and allows for a constructive debate. In particular, the moderator reserves the right to refuse the publication of messages that are redundant, of an advertising or promotional nature, contrary to public order or morality, violent, racist, revisionist, advocating war crimes, insulting or rude, contrary to copyright or related rights, to the law applicable to databases, to trademark law, to image rights, to the right to privacy or which would violate any other legislative or regulatory provision in force.
Any published message remains nevertheless under the responsibility of its author.
Readers may request verification of any contentious message posted on this Forum by contacting the moderator at the following address: [comments@rtl.lu & lieserbreif@rtl.lu]. At the same address, they may inform the moderator of incidents that have occurred in the context of the Forum and which are likely to infringe or endanger the rules applicable to the part of the Forum concerned.
In view of the daily influx of reactions to the various elements published, the moderator reserves the right not to be obliged to reply to the various individual remarks that are sent.
Modification of messages
The editors reserve the right to modify and/or delete any content of a message that appears to them to be in clear contradiction with the laws and regulations in force. The modified and published message remains nevertheless always under the responsibility of its author.
Please avoid using "[...]", reserved for the editorial staff to indicate that part of the comment has been left out.
Indexing of messages
We expressly draw your attention to the fact that the contributions published in the RTL Forum are likely to be indexed by search engines and that your published contributions are therefore also likely to be indexed by these search engines and are accessible at any time on the Internet via the rtl.lu site.
Destination of collected data and archived messages
This Forum holds and keeps all data that may allow the identification of the authors of the messages and proceeds to the private archiving of the posted messages. This information may only be communicated to a judicial, administrative or police authority authorised for this purpose. RTL will cooperate with any request to this effect from the authorities, with the aim of guaranteeing the serenity of exchanges and compliance with these rules on the Forum.
The content of the messages may also, exceptionally and after anonymisation, be communicated to a scientific or university research organisation.
Nevertheless, RTL reserves the right to contact you if RTL needs your help or/and your testimony in the context of a television or radio report. However, your anonymity will be guaranteed in accordance with the provisions of the law on the protection of journalists' sources ("Quelleschutz").
Protection of personal data
In accordance with Regulation (EU) 2016/679 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 27 April 2016 on the protection of individuals with regard to the processing of personal data and on the free movement of such data and repealing Directive 95/46/EC (General Data Protection Regulation), you have the right to access, modify, rectify and delete data concerning you.
You can exercise this right by sending a message to: [
privacy@rtl.lu
]
Or by sending a letter to:
RTL newMedia Luxembourg
Re. : Personal data – Access
43, boulevard Pierre Frieden
L-1543 Luxembourg
Privacy Policy
This policy informs you about the processing of your personal data in relation to the site and the sub-sites of rtl.lu (hereinafter “our site”) and the radio contests as well as the rights available to you in this regard, in accordance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (GDPR).
This policy is made on behalf of:
CLT-UFA S.A. Division RTL NewMedia Luxembourg
43 bd Pierre Frieden
L-1543 Luxembourg
(hereinafter : « us »)
1. Processing activites
In this part, we inform you about the various data processing activites carried out in relation to our site, including their purposes, their legal basis, the retention period of your personal data as well as the possible consequences if you decide not to provide your personal data. Where applicable, we will also inform you about the recipients or categories of recipients of your personal data as well as the safeguards put in place for data transfers outside the European Economic Area. If we have not obtained your personal data directly from you, we will also inform you about the sources of your personal data.
Since the processing of your personal data depends on your interactions with our site and the services relating to it, it is possible that all parts of this Privacy Policy may not apply to you.
1.1 Cookies and similar technologies
Our site contains cookies and similar technologies, including from third parties, to ensure the proper functioning of the website, to improve your experience, to analyze and improve the impact of the website and to provide you with personalized ads. For more information about the use of cookies on our site and the options available to you in this regard, please consult our Cookie Policy.
1.2 Your account
We offer you the possibility to create an account on our site. The processing of data related to your account is necessary to provide you with an account and the corresponding functionalities on the basis of the performance of the contract that applies when you use our services (Article 6(1)(b) of the GDPR). Based on our legitimate interest in securing our site, we ask that you provide us with a telephone number to protect your account against hacking attempts or other unauthorized access.
When you choose to sign up with your Apple-ID, we receive from Apple your name and email address. When you choose to register with your Facebook account, we receive from Facebook your name, email address and profile photo. When you choose to sign up with your Google Account, we receive from Google your name, email address, language selection and profile photo. For more information on the processing of your personal data by these different providers, please refer directly to the data protection policies of these different providers.
For the purposes described above, we retain data related to your account for the duration that you maintain your account. You can modify some of the data linked to your account or delete your account directly in the
Privacy Center
corresponding to your account.
The fields marked with an asterisk in the registration form as well as your phone number to secure your account are mandatory data. Without providing these data, you cannot create an account on our site.
1.3 Your comments and publications on our site
If you place a comment or make a publication, we process your personal data to ensure the effective publication of your comment or post on the basis of the performance of the contract that applies when you use our services (article 6(1)(b) of the GDPR). Based on our legitimate interest in moderating content on our site, we process your data in connection with your post to ensure that it complies with our
Terms of Use
(GDPR Article 6 (1) (f)) .
For this purpose, we keep your personal data relating to your comments or publications for the duration that your comment or publication is accessible online or until you delete your account.
Without providing your personal data, we cannot publish your comment or post.
1.4 Newsletters/SMS Services/Push Messages
We offer various services that allow you to stay informed of the latest news. You can subscribe to our
newsletter by email
, to our various
SMS services
or to our push messages via our mobile application. For the provision of these services, we process your personal data on the basis of the performance of the underlying contract (Article 6(1)(b) of the GDPR).
On the basis of your consent (Article 6(1)(a) GDPR), we may also process your personal data to advertise our services or those of our partners, including contests, advice and promotions, through newsletters, SMS or push messages.
We keep your personal data for this purpose until you deactivate the service in question or withdraw your consent.
For sending push messages, we use the services of OneSignal, a company located in California, United States. The transfer of your personal data to OneSignal is based on Standard Contractual Clauses as adopted by the European Commission.
For sending SMS, we use the services of the Luxembourg company mPulse, which acts as an intermediary between us and the telecom operators.
Without the provision of your personal data, you will not benefit from the services in question.
1.5 Games/Contests/Quizzes
When you participate in games/contests/quizzes via our site or by any other means, for example by SMS, we process your personal data to register you as a participant, to determine the winner (s) and, if applicable , allow the various partners to present their prize to the winner (s). For this purpose, we process your personal data on the basis of the contract that applies when you participate in such games/contests/quizzes (Article 6(1)(b) of the GDPR). We process your participation data also in our legitimate interest to ensure fair participation conditions for everyone and to prevent abuse (Article 6(1)(f) of the GDPR)
Your personal data collected during registration will be communicated to the various partners only if you are among the winner (s). In some cases, we deliver the prize directly to you, without sharing your information with the partner of the game/contest/quiz.
For these purposes, we keep your participation data until the prize has been withdrawn or at most 1 year after the end of the game/contest/quiz in question.
Without providing your personal data, you cannot participate in the game/contest/quiz in question.
1.6 Photos
We may post photos on our site in which you are represented. In general, we do not publish photos of you without your consent (Article 6(1)(a) GDPR). In particular, we consider the fact that you pose for a photo taken by one of our photographers as a clear affirmative act constituting consent.
In some cases, however, we rely on our legitimate interest as well as that of the author and our readers in the exercise of the fundamental right to freedom of expression and information to publish your photo (Article 6(1)(f) of the GDPR). This could be the case in particular when you find yourself incidentally in a photo taken at a public demonstration or when you are a public person.
Photos may be taken by one of our staff or sent to us by a third party.
Where the posting of your photo is based on your consent, it will be kept online until you withdraw your consent. Where the post is based on our legitimate interest or that of third parties, it will be kept online until you exercise your right to object, unless there are compelling legitimate grounds to maintain the post online which prevail over your interests and your rights and freedoms. We may withdraw the publication on our own initiative, especially when it is no longer relevant.
You are not required to provide us with your photo for publication on our site.
1.7 Other publications
We may post content on our site, particularly in the form of an article, including personal data relating to you. In general, such publication is made on the basis of our legitimate interest as well as that of the author and our readers for the exercise of the fundamental right to freedom of expression and information (article 6(1)(f) of the GDPR). We rely on a legitimate interest, in particular, when the publication makes a contribution to a debate of public interest (
e.g.
in the field of political speech or questions of public interest).
In some cases, where we believe that legitimate interest is not the appropriate basis for publication, we will rely on your consent for publication (Article 6(1)(a) GDPR). This could be the case when we would like to publish your comment about an anecdotal event.
The categories of data concerned may consist of your first and last name, the context in which your first and last name is referred to, or/and an event or facts concerning you. We obtain this data either directly from you or from a person protected by confidentiality of journalists’ sources (
Quellenschutz
), including our associates.
Where the post is based on your consent, it will be kept online until you withdraw your consent. Where the post is based on our legitimate interest or that of third parties, it will be kept online until you exercise your right to object, unless there are compelling legitimate grounds to maintain the post online which override your interests and your rights and freedoms. We may withdraw the publication on our own initiative, in particular when it is no longer relevant.
You are under no obligation to provide us with data for posting content on our site.
1.8 Other processing activities
(a) Log data
We may use log data relating to site visits:
to solve functional problems of our site and to correct bugs based for the performance of the contract which applies when you use our services (article 6(1)(b) of the GDPR); and or
to detect and prevent unwanted or abusive activities (
e.g.
phishing or spam activities) based on our legitimate interest in the prevention of fraud (Article 6(1)(f) of the GDPR);
We keep the log data for a period of 6 months.
Our log file contains data that our users automatically provide during their visit to our site under applicable communication protocols. The provision of these data is therefore technically necessary to access our site.
(b) Content hosted on third party servers
With the exception of cookies or similar technologies (see point 1.1 above), our site may contain content hosted on third party servers.
When you visit a page of our site that contains such content hosted on third-party servers, your http request, including information about your user agent (i.e. the device through which you access our site) as well as your IP address, is transmitted to the server of the third party concerned. If applicable, your request is accompanied by a referrer, indicating to the target server the address of the page on which the content concerned is embedded.
The transmission of your http request together with, where applicable, a referrer in this context is necessary for the purposes of our legitimate interest in offering our audience a diverse and attractive website (Article 6 (1) (f) of GDPR).
We do not store your personal data for these purposes.
The providers from whom we integrate content on our site, that is to say the recipients of your personal data, may vary over time. These are typically online service providers. For the transfer of your personal data to recipients located outside the European Economic Area, we rely either on an adequacy decision adopted by the European Commission or on standard data protection clauses adopted by the European Commission.
Providing your http request is technically necessary to access our site under applicable communication protocols.
(c) Processing in relation to litigation and the authorities
We keep and may process your personal data in relation to our site, for example your personal data in relation to comments or publications on our site, on the basis of our legitimate interest in the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims (article 6(1)(f) of the GDPR).
For this purpose, we store your personal data until the deletion of your account or, in the event of an ongoing or anticipated dispute, for the duration of the applicable limitation periods.
We share your personal data, notably in connection with your comment or publication, where applicable, with the authorities, either on the basis of our legitimate interest in the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims (Article 6 (1) (f) of the GDPR) either on the basis of our legal obligation to assist in the investigative measures of the Luxembourg judicial authorities or the State Prosecutor (
procureur d’État
) for the prevention, investigation, detection and prosecution of criminal offenses (Article 6(1)(c ) of the GDPR).
You are not obligated to provide us with data specifically for the purposes described under this heading.
(d) Backups
We may keep your data in connection with the backups we make on the basis of our legitimate interest in saving data in relation to our site to have the ability to restore them in the event of loss (article 6(1)(f) of the GDPR).
We keep our backups for a period of 10 years.
To perform our backups, we use the Luxembourg company BCE - BROADCASTING CENTER S.A. which in this capacity may be the recipient of your data.
You are not required to provide us with data specifically so that we can keep it in our backups.
(e) IP location
We may process your IP address to determine the country from which you access our site and, depending on your location, give you access or not to certain content on the basis of our legitimate interest in complying with our obligations in terms of intellectual property (article 6(1 )(f) of the GDPR).
We do not store your data for this purpose.
Providing your IP address is technically necessary to access our site.
2. Hosting of our site
We host our site at BCE - BROADCASTING CENTER EUROPE S.A. in Luxembourg which in this capacity is the recipient of your personal data.
3. Your rights
You have the legal right to obtain information so that you can determine whether we hold your personal data, to access them and to make corrections, update, revise or delete them within reasonable limits.
We will respond to your request to exercise such rights in due course (and in any event within 30 days of receiving a request).
Rights belonging to you:
Right of access to data
Right to rectification
Right to erasure
Right to object to processing
Right to restriction of processing;
Right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority;
Right to withdraw consent; and
Right to data portability
You can exercise any of these rights by contacting us at:
privacy@rtl.lu
.
You can modify some of the data linked to your account or delete your account directly in the
Privacy Center
corresponding to your account.
To exercise your rights in relation to cookies and similar technologies used on our site, we invite you to consult our
Cookie Policy
.
3.1 Access to information
You have the right to obtain confirmation as to whether or not we are processing your personal data. When we process your personal data, you have the right to access them and obtain certain information about their processing. This additional information includes, in particular, details of the purposes of processing, the categories of personal data concerned and the recipients of the personal data. Provided that the rights and freedoms of others are not adversely affected, we will send you a copy of your personal data.
One request per year will be processed free of charge; more frequent requests may require payment of a reasonable fee. We will respond to your request by sending you a copy electronically, unless the request specifically indicates another method.
You have the right to request access to the information we hold about you. You can do this by contacting us at
privacy@rtl.lu
. In order for us to respond to your request, we may ask you to confirm your identity.
3.2 Rectification and deletion
You have the right to request the rectification of any personal data concerning you which are inaccurate and, taking into account the purpose of the processing, you can request the addition of information to your personal data if they turn out to be incomplete.
At any time, you can access and modify your personal data in the
Privacy Center
corresponding to your account on our site. However, if you still believe that the personal data we have about you are incorrect, please do not hesitate to contact us so that we can update them and ensure their accuracy.
If any of your personal data change (
e.g.
postal code, email or postal address), please review those data in our
Privacy Center
, or email us the changes to enable us to correct or update your personal data.
If at any time you want CLT - UFA S.A. to delete your information, you can do so in our
Privacy Center
, or you can simply contact us at this email address: privacy@rtl.lu. In certain cases, including in particular when we need your personal data for the exercise of the right to freedom of expression and information or for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, your right to deletion may not apply.
3.3 Right of objection
You have the right to object at any time, for reasons relating to your particular situation, to the processing of your personal data based on a legitimate interest. In this case, we no longer process your personal data, unless we have compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests and your rights and freedoms or we require your personal data for the establishment, exercise or defense legal claims.
You still have the right to object at any time to the processing of your personal data for the direct marketing purposes, including profiling, in which case we will stop processing them for these purposes.
3.4 Right to restriction of processing
You have the right to obtain the restriction of the processing of your personal data when:
you contest the accuracy of your personal data;
the processing is unlawful;
we no longer need your personal data but you need it for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims; or
you have objected to the processing and we have not yet been able to verify whether we have legitimate grounds which override yours.
When processing has been limited, your personal data may, with the exception of storage, only be processed with your consent, or for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, or for the protection of the rights of another natural or legal person, or for reasons of important public interest of the Union or of a Member State.
We inform you when we lift the restriction on processing.
3.5 Right to data portability
For all your personal data which we process on the basis of the contract that applies when you use our services or on the basis of your consent, you have the right to obtain that these data are transmitted directly to another controller, where technically feasible and without infringing the rights and freedoms of third parties.
3.6 Right to withdraw your consent
You have the right to withdraw your consent to any processing of your personal data carried out on this basis. In this case we stop the treatment concerned. The withdrawal of consent does not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
3.7 Right to lodge a complaint
You have the right to lodge a complaint with the
Commission nationale pour la protection des données
(National Commission for Data Protection, in short CNPD) or with another European supervisory authority (e.g. that of the country where you reside). Before making such a complaint, we encourage you to address your questions and comments regarding the processing of your personal data directly to us. We take the protection of your personal data seriously and will do our best in responding to any complaints you may have.
4. Data controller
We are responsible for the processing of personal data described in this policy. For the determination of the responsibility for the processing in relation to cookies and similar technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
5. Modification
We may revise this Privacy Policy at any time, and we advise you to periodically review our site to review the most recent applicable version.
Cookie Policy
This policy informs you about the use of cookies on the site and sub-sites of rtl.lu (hereinafter “our site”) as well as the options available to you in this regard.
This policy is made on behalf of:
CLT-UFA S.A. Division RTL NewMedia Luxembourg
43 bd Pierre Frieden
L-1543 Luxembourg
(hereinafter “us”)
1. What is a cookie ?
A cookie is a small text file sent to your browser when you visit a website. It can be sent either directly by the server that hosts the website you are visiting or by a third party server to which the website may have transmitted your request. By default, your browser keeps the cookie and returns it each time a new request is made to the server from which it came. A cookie can only be read by the server that placed it. A cookie may, for example, contain an identification number allowing to recognize your browser when you interact with the website in question. It may also contain a simple “yes” or “no” response, for example to remember your choice with regard to cookies.
Alternatively, a website can use the localStorage function of your browser. The localStorage works in much the same way as a cookie. Similar to a cookie, this feature allows your browser to save data about a website and access it as needed. A registration by localStorage is specific to a determined server. For the purposes of this policy, the notion of "cookie" refers to both a cookie and the localStorage function.
2. Who may place cookies on our site ?
Cookies on our site can be placed either directly by us or by the service providers with whom we cooperate or by the partners of these service providers.
We cooperate with third-party service providers who may place cookies via integrated solutions on our site. Some of these service providers may process personal data on their own behalf. For more information on the data processing that these service providers carry out on their own behalf, please consult their respective data protection policies.
In this case, we cooperate with the following service providers:
Service provider
Role
Permutive
Audience measurement services related to advertising on our site
Gigya
Solution for connecting to your personal account on our site
Google
Audience measurement and online advertising services
Adnuntius
Online advertising services
Qualifio
Solution to make quizzes and surveys on our site
Facebook
Solution allowing you to connect to our site via your Facebook account as well as referencing content on our site
LinkedIn
Solution for referencing content on our site
Didomi
Cookie consent management solution
Twitter
Solution for referencing content on our site
Instagram
Solution for referencing content on our site
IP Luxembourg
Solution for making surveys on our site
Infogram
Service allowing to display computer graphics in articles
Clickup
Solution for making surveys on our site
OneSignal
Solution for sending push notifications
A list of our service providers' partners is available at
https://privacy-center.rtl.lu/fr#cookie-list
.
3. What are the purposes pursued by cookies on our site ?
The cookies used on our site serve different purposes:
3.1 Cookies strictly necessary for the operation of our site
These cookies are required to enable you to visit our sites and to use certain parts of them. They allow to:
Keep the choice you have expressed on the placing of cookies;
Securely access to your personal account;
Maintain your connection to your personal account during your visit;
Establish statistics of visits and/or performance;
Interact with our site, for example when you fill in forms; or
Navigate between the different pages of our site.
The use of these cookies is based on our legitimate interest to ensure the proper functioning of our services under Article 6(1)(f) of the GDPR. If you oppose the use of these cookies, the proper functioning of our site will no longer be guaranteed.
3.2 Functional cookies
These cookies are intended to facilitate access to our site and to make its use more pleasant and personalised. They allow to:
Personalise our site by memorising your preferences (e.g. the volume level during an audio or video consultation); and
Maintain the connection to your personal account from one browsing session to the next.
We require your consent under Article 6(1)(a) of the GDPR for the use of these cookies. You can always revoke your choice later. If you refuse to give your consent, you will not benefit from the additional functionalities that these cookies provide.
3.3 Analytic cookies
Analytical cookies on our site enable us to measure the use of our site and to evaluate it in order to optimise our offer for you. When we receive from our service providers statistics that have been compiled using cookies on our site, we only receive such data in aggregated form. We do not have access to any information about a specific visitor's interaction with our site.
We require your consent under Article 6(1)(a) of the GDPR for the use of these cookies. You can always revoke your choice later. If you refuse to give your consent, your use of our site will not be reflected in the statistics we receive and evaluate in order to optimise our offer for you.
Specific information in relation to Google Analytics
In order to design our pages to meet your needs and constantly optimise them, we use Google Analytics, a web analysis service provided by Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland (
https://www.google.de/intl/en/about/
) – hereinafter “Google”. In this context, pseudonymised user profiles are created and cookies are used. The information generated by the cookie about your use of our site, such as
Browser type/version,
Operating system used,
Referrer URL (the page previously visited),
Host name of the accessing computer (IP address),
Time of server request,
are transmitted to a Google server in the United States and stored there. The information is used to evaluate the use of our site, to compile reports on our site activities and to provide other services related to the use of our site. This information may also be transferred to third parties if required by law or if third parties process this data on our behalf. Your IP address will under no circumstances be merged with other Google data. IP addresses are processed in such a way that an allocation is no longer possible (IP masking).
Personal data protection laws in the US may differ from the protection granted in the EU and can therefore only guarantee a lower level of protection. If personal data is processed by Google Analytics in the USA, this will be done on the basis of appropriate privacy and security measures to ensure the protection of your data. Google will enter into the EU standard clauses for this purpose.
You can prevent the collection of the data generated by the cookie relating to your use of the site (including your IP address) and the processing of this data by Google by downloading and installing an add-on for your browser (
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en
).
As an alternative to the browser extension, especially in the case of browsers on mobile devices, you can also prevent Google Analytics from saving data by clicking on
https://privacy-center.rtl.lu/
. An opt-out cookie is set to prevent the future collection of your information when you visit this site. The opt-out cookie is only valid in this browser and only for our site and is stored on your device.
If you delete the cookies in this browser, you will need to set the opt-out cookie again.
Further information on data protection in Google Analytics can be found on Google's website, Analytics Help (
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=en
).
3.4 Cookies related to advertising or targeting
Cookies related to advertising or targeting allow to:
Personalise your experience by recommending content that may be of interest to you based on your interests or age range and offer variety so that you do not have to keep seeing the same news and banners over and over again when you visit our site; and
Finance our site - the advertisements we place generate advertising revenue to pay our journalists, photographers, technicians, etc. and to offer you the content of our site for free.
We require your consent under Article 6(1)(a) of the GDPR for the use of these cookies. You can always revoke your choice later. If you refuse to give your consent, you may see advertisements that are of less interest to you.
4. Who is responsible for the processing of cookies on our site ?
We are responsible for the collection of your request made to our site and the transmission thereof to the third party service providers mentioned in point 2 above and to their partners. We are also responsible for data processing carried out for the purposes we pursue in connection with cookies strictly necessary for the operation of our site, functional cookies and analytics cookies (see point 3 above).
5. How long are the cookies retained on our site ?
We generally limit the retention period of our cookies to a maximum of one year. Some of the cookies of our service providers and their partners are exceptionally kept for a period of up to 3 years. The entries in localStorage are kept until you delete them in your browser. Google has defined a period of 17 years for the retention of cookies by which they save your choice in terms of cookies and targeted advertising.
You can consult the retention period of each cookie individually and delete them in your browser settings (see point 7 below).
6. What measures do we take for data transfers outside the european economic area ?
Some of our service providers and partners of our service providers are located in the United States of America. For such transfers, we have implemented and continue to implement the standard contractual clauses referred to in Article 46(2) of the GDP R. The standard contractual clauses we use are those approved by the European Commission, available at
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection/standard-contractual-clauses-scc_en
.
7. What are my options in relation to cookies ?
You can set your choice in relation to cookies using our settings tool available at:
https://privacy-center.rtl.lu/
.
To express your choice in terms of online advertising and targeting, you can also use the tool available at
https://www.youronlinechoices.com/
.
Alternatively, you can configure your browser to accept or block cookies. This way you can also at all times delete the cookies already installed on your computer or mobile device. The manner in which you can activate or deactivate cookies and delete them depends on your device and internet browser.
7.1 Google Chrome
Open the “Google Chrome” browser.
Click on the “Chrome” menu in the browser toolbar.
Select “Settings / Preferences”.
At the bottom of the page, click on “Show advanced settings”.
In the “Privacy” section, click on the “Content Settings...” button.
In the “Cookies” section, to block all cookies select “Prohibit all sites from storing data”, to allow all cookies select “Allow local data storage”.
For further information, please refer to the Google site :
https://support.google.com/accounts/answer/61416?hl=en
.
7.2 Microsoft Internet Explorer 10, 11, Edge
Open the “Microsoft Internet Explorer” browser or the “Control Panel”.
Click on “Tools” and then on “Internet Options”.
Click on the “Privacy” tab, then under “Settings”, move the slider up to block all cookies or down to allow all cookies, then click on OK.
For further information, please refer to the Microsoft site:
https://support.microsoft.com/en-us/topic/delete-and-manage-cookies-168dab11-0753-043d-7c16-ede5947fc64d
.
7.3 Safari for OSX
Open the “Safari” browser.
Click on “Safari” in the toolbar and select “Preferences”
Click on “Confidentiality”
To accept cookies, tick “Always allow” in the section “Cookies and website data”
To block cookies, tick “Always block” in the section “Cookies and website data”
For further information, please refer to the Apple site:
https://support.apple.com/lv-lv/guide/safari/sfri11471/mac
.
7.4 Safari for iOS
Open the “Settings” application.
Select “Safari”.
Select “Cookies”.
To accept cookies: select “Allow”.
To block cookies: select “Block”.
For further information, please refer to the Apple site:
https://support.apple.com/en-us/HT201265
.
7.5 Mozilla Firefox
Open the “Mozilla Firefox” browser.
Click on the menu bar, select “Tools” then “Options”.
Select the “Privacy” panel.
In “History”, for “Retention rules” set the options to “Use custom settings for history”.
Check the “Accept cookies” box to enable cookies and uncheck it to disable them.
For further information, please refer to the Mozilla site:
https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/enhanced-tracking-protection-firefox-desktop
7.6 Other browsers
Please refer to your browser's help or go to its publisher's website.
8. Your data protection rights
We generally do not have access to personal data processed through cookies on our site. When we receive statistics from our service providers that have been compiled using cookies on our site, we receive such data only in aggregate form, meaning that we cannot link to a specific user.
However, we do have access to the information contained in the cookies that have been set directly by us and that your browser sends back to us during your visit to our site. Without obtaining additional information from you, it is not possible for us to link this data with your name.
We inform you that you have the right to request access to your personal data as well as the rectification or erasure thereof. You can access yourself the information contained in the cookies set by us by clicking on the following link:
https://privacy-center.rtl.lu/en#cookie-list
. To view the content of all cookies stored by your browser and delete them if necessary, please refer to your browser settings (see point 7 above).
You also have the right to request restriction of the processing of your personal data as well as the right to object to the processing of your personal data based on a legitimate interest. You will find more information on exercising your right to object in point 7 above.
Finally, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the
Commission nationale pour la protection des données
(National Commission for Data Protection, in short CNPD) or with another European supervisory authority (e.g. that of the country where you reside). Before making such a complaint, we encourage you to address your questions and comments regarding the processing of your personal data directly to us. We take the protection of your personal data seriously and will do our best in responding to any complaints you may have.
For more information on the exercise of your data protection rights and other personal data processing on our site, please refer to our data protection policy, available at&nbsp:
https://privacy-center.rtl.lu/
.
Cookie list
RTL.lu
didomi_token
eyJ1c2VyX2lkIjoiMTk1OTRlZWYtOGEwNS02N2VkLWJmNTktYWVmZWFjZjQ1MzliIiwiY3JlYXRlZCI6IjIwMjUtMDMtMTRUMTM6NTQ6MDQuMDY0WiIsInVwZGF0ZWQiOiIyMDI1LTAzLTE0VDEzOjU0OjA0LjA2NloiLCJ2ZXJzaW9uIjpudWxsfQ==
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://privacy-center.rtl.lu/:
Conditions d'utilisation
Politique en matière de protection des données
Politique en matière de cookies
Liste de cookie RTL.lu
Conditions d'utilisation
Version du 31.10.2020
1. Acceptation des Conditions d'Utilisation
Bienvenue sur le portail Internet d’RTL Luxembourg. Les services vous sont fournis sous réserve que vous vous engagiez à respecter les présentes conditions d'utilisation (ci-après dénommées " Conditions d'Utilisation " que nous sommes libres de modifier à tout moment. Il vous est donc conseillé de vous référer régulièrement à la dernière version des Conditions d'Utilisation disponible en permanence à l'adresse suivante :
https://privacy-center.rtl.lu/fr#terms
De plus, l'utilisation de certains services de RTL Luxembourg peut nécessiter le respect de règles ou lignes de conduite additionnelles et spécifiques qui seront indiquées dans une charte spécifique qui se trouvera à cet effet sur le site. Ces règles et lignes de conduite sont réputées faire partie intégrante des Conditions d'Utilisation.
Il est précisé que RTL Luxembourg peut proposer d'autres services pour lesquels des conditions d'utilisation spécifiques devront être acceptées avant toute utilisation.
2. Description du service
RTL Luxembourg fournit actuellement à ses utilisateurs un vaste choix de services en ligne, parmi lesquels notamment du contenu personnalisé et des programmes de marque RTL disponibles sur son réseau de services (ci-après dénommés collectivement le " Service ").
Sauf disposition expresse contraire, toute nouvelle caractéristique qui améliore ou augmente plusieurs services existants ou tout nouveau service lancé par RTL seront soumis aux présentes Conditions d'Utilisation.
Vous avez conscience et acceptez le fait que le Service vous est fourni " en l'état " et que RTL ne peut être tenu pour responsable de l'opportunité, la suppression ou du défaut de stockage des communications personnalisées des utilisateurs.
Afin d'utiliser le Service, il vous faut un accès Internet, soit directement, soit par l'intermédiaire de systèmes ayant accès à du contenu fourni sur Internet, étant précisé que les éventuels frais correspondants sont à votre seule charge. De plus, vous devez vous munir de tout matériel nécessaire, et notamment d'un ordinateur, tablette ou smartphone, d'un modem ou de tout autre outil de connexion, afin d'assurer cette connexion au réseau Internet. Il vous faut être conscient que, dans certaines zones du Service, est diffusé du contenu réservé aux adultes et dont l'accès est donc réservé aux utilisateurs de 18 ans et plus.
3. Obligation de s'inscrire
Par l'utilisation faite du Service vous acceptez de :
fournir des informations vraies, exactes, à jour et complètes sur vous-mêmes comme demandé dans le formulaire d'inscription au Service (ces informations étant ci-après dénommées les " Données d'Inscription ") et
maintenir et remettre à jour régulièrement les Données d'Inscription afin de les conserver vraies, exactes, à jour et complètes. Dans l'hypothèse où vous fourniriez des informations fausses, inexactes, périmées ou incomplètes, RTL serait en droit de suspendre ou de résilier votre compte et de vous refuser immédiatement et pour le futur l'accès à tout ou partie du Service.
RTL est soucieux du respect de la sécurité et de la vie privée de ses utilisateurs et plus particulièrement des enfants et jeunes en dessous de 16 ans. C'est pourquoi les parents sont invités à surveiller l'utilisation faite par leurs enfants de l'accès à l'Internet et à garder présent à l'esprit que le Service est conçu pour toucher un large public et qu'en leur qualité de tuteurs légaux il est de la responsabilité des parents de déterminer quel Service est ou non approprié pour leur(s) enfant(s) et de surveiller l'utilisation qu'ils en font.
4. Politique d’RTL en matière de vie privée
Les Données d'Inscription et éventuellement d'autres informations à votre sujet sont soumises à la Charte de Vie Privée de RTL conforme au Règlement (UE) 2016/679 du Parlement Européen et du Conseil du 27 avril 2016 relatif à la protection des personnes physiques à l’égard du traitement des données à caractère personnel et à la libre circulation de ces données, et abrogeant la directive 95/46/CE (règlement général sur la protection des données).
En outre, il faut noter que selon le Règlement, vous disposez d'un droit de consultation, de modification et de retrait de toutes données personnelles portées à la connaissance de RTL.
RTL met tout en œuvre pour protéger vos données. Vos données sont protégées contre toute perte, destruction, falsification ou manipulation ainsi que contre tout accès de toute sorte et/ou nature non-autorisé.
Les données recueillies lors de l'inscription seront communiquées aux différents partenaires uniquement au cas où le joueur figurera parmi le(s) gagnant(s) et qu’il a donné son consentement.
Néanmoins, RTL se réserve le droit de vous contacter si RTL avait besoin de votre aide ou/et de votre témoignage dans le cadre d’un reportage télévisé ou radiophonique. Toutefois, votre anonymat sera garanti, selon les dispositions en vigueur quant à la loi de la protection des sources du journaliste ("Quelleschutz").
5. Compte d'Utilisateur, Mot de Passe et Sécurité
À l'issue de la procédure d'inscription, vous définissez un nom de compte et un mot de passe. Vous êtes seul responsable de la conservation du caractère confidentiel de vos compte et mot de passe et de toutes actions qui pourront être faites sur votre compte et/ou avec votre mot de passe. Vous vous engagez :
à informer immédiatement RTL de toute utilisation non-autorisée de votre compte et/ou de votre mot de passe et/ou de toute atteinte à la sécurité, et
à vous assurer qu'à l'issue de chaque session vous vous déconnectez explicitement. RTL ne pourra être tenu responsable de toute perte ou dommage survenant en cas de manquement aux obligations du présent paragraphe 5.
6. Responsabilités des utilisateurs
Vous êtes conscient que vous seul, et non RTL, êtes responsable de la visualisation de toutes les informations, données, textes, logiciels, musiques, sons, photographies, images, vidéos, messages ou tous autres matériels (ci-après dénommés collectivement le " Contenu ").
Vous reconnaissez que le contenu du site ne vous a pas été envoyé mais que c'est votre propre choix conscient et éclairé d'y accéder. Vous vous engagez à ne consulter ce serveur qu'à titre personnel sans impliquer de quelque manière que ce soit une société privée ou un organisme public et sans en exploiter le contenu de façon commerciale ou non.
Par conséquent, vous êtes conscient d'assumer seul votre pleine et entière responsabilité si un ou plusieurs des engagements et déclarations susmentionnés s'avéraient être inexacts.
7. Recommandation particulière aux utilisateurs internationaux
Compte tenu du caractère mondial du réseau Internet, vous acceptez de vous conformer à toutes les règles applicables dans le pays où vous consultez le Contenu, au comportement des utilisateurs du réseau et au Contenu admissible. En particulier vous acceptez de vous conformer aux lois applicables en matière de transfert de données à partir du Luxembourg ou du pays où vous résidez.
8. Interdiction de revendre le Service
Vous vous interdisez de reproduire, copier, vendre, revendre, ou exploiter dans un but commercial quel qu’il soit toute partie du Service, toute utilisation du Service, ou tout droit d'accès au Service.
9. Règles générales en matière d'utilisation et de stockage
Vous reconnaissez que RTL peut poser des règles générales et des limites quant à l'utilisation du Service, et notamment, sans que cette énumération soit limitative, fixer un maximum au nombre de fois où vous pouvez accéder à un Service pendant une période donnée (ainsi que la durée maximale de chaque accès).
Vous reconnaissez que RTL sera libre de supprimer tout compte resté inutilisé pendant un certain temps et que RTL est libre de modifier les présentes règles générales à tout moment, c'est pourquoi RTL vous recommande de vous y référer régulièrement.
10. Modification du Service
RTL se réserve le droit, à tout moment, de modifier, d'interrompre temporairement ou de manière permanente tout ou partie du Service et ce sans avoir à vous en informer préalablement. RTL ne pourra être tenu responsable à votre encontre ou à l'encontre de tout tiers pour toute modification, suspension ou interruption du Service.
11. Résiliation
Vous reconnaissez à RTL le droit de mettre fin à tout ou partie du droit d'accès correspondant à votre mot de passe, voire de supprimer votre compte et mot de passe, ainsi que le droit de retirer ou de déplacer tout Contenu sur le Service et ce pour tout motif notamment en raison de l'absence d'utilisation, ou si RTL a de bonnes raisons de croire que vous avez violé ou agi en contradiction avec la lettre ou l'esprit des présentes Conditions d'Utilisation.
RTL peut également unilatéralement et à tout moment interrompre la fourniture du Service. Vous reconnaissez que toute résiliation de votre accès au Service en application des termes des présentes peut intervenir sans mise en demeure préalable, et vous reconnaissez et acceptez que RTL sera en droit de désactiver ou supprimer à tout moment et avec effet immédiat votre compte et/ou interdire tout accès ultérieur au Service. De plus vous reconnaissez que RTL ne pourra être tenu responsable à votre encontre ou à l'encontre de tiers pour toute résiliation de votre accès au Service.
12. Relation avec les annonceurs
Vos correspondances, votre relation commerciale avec des annonceurs, ou votre participation à des promotions organisées par des annonceurs trouvés par ou sur le Service y compris le paiement et la livraison de biens et de services, ou tous autres termes, conditions, garanties ou déclarations en relation avec ces opérations se fait directement entre vous et l'annonceur.
En conséquence, vous reconnaissez que RTL ne peut être tenu pour responsable de toute perte ou tout dommage quel qu’il soit consécutif à cette relation ou plus largement à la présence d'annonceurs sur le Service.
13. Droit de propriété d’RTL
Vous reconnaissez et acceptez que le Service et tout logiciel utilisé nécessairement en relation avec le Service (ci-après dénommés " Logiciels ") peuvent contenir des informations confidentielles et protégées par le droit de propriété intellectuelle en vigueur ou toute autre loi.
Vous reconnaissez également avoir connaissance que le Contenu compris dans des publicités sponsorisées, les informations qui vous sont présentées via le Service ou par des annonceurs sont protégés par le droit d'auteur, le droit des marques, le droit des brevets, ou tout autre droit reconnu par la législation en vigueur. Sauf expressément autorisé à cet effet par RTL ou par l'annonceur, vous vous engagez à ne pas modifier, louer, emprunter, vendre, distribuer ou créer d'œuvres dérivées basées en tout ou partie sur le Service ou les Logiciels.
RTL vous accorde, à titre personnel, le droit non exclusif et non cessible d'utiliser les Logiciels ; étant précisé qu'il vous est interdit (et que vous ne pouvez accorder à autrui l'autorisation ) de copier, modifier, créer une œuvre dérivée, inverser la conception ou l'assemblage ou de toute autre manière tenter de trouver le code source, vendre, attribuer, sous-licencier ou transférer de quelque manière que ce soit tout droit afférent aux Logiciels. Vous vous engagez à ne modifier, en aucune manière, le Logiciel ou à ne pas utiliser de versions modifiées des Logiciels et notamment (sans que cette énumération soit limitative) en vue d'obtenir un accès non autorisé au Service. Vous acceptez de ne pas accéder au Service par une autre interface que l'interface qui vous est fournie par RTL à cet effet.
Pour les contributions au Forum de RTL, vous nous accordez, sans redevance, pour le monde entier, pour la durée de protection des droits de propriété intellectuelle sous-jacents et sans exclusivité, le droit d'utiliser en tout ou en partie ces contributions, de les reproduire, modifier, raccourcir, publier, traduire, distribuer, diffuser, afficher dans des médias tels que la radio et la télévision, de les rendre disponibles sur Internet pour une consultation individuelle, d’en accorder à des tiers des droits simples d'utilisation et de les adopter dans d'autres œuvres.
14. Garanties
a) Votre utilisation du Service se fait à vos risques et périls. Le Service vous est fourni sur la base d'un Service " en l'état " et accessible en fonction de sa disponibilité. RTL ne fournit aucune garantie expresse ou implicite en ce compris, sans que l'énumération ne soit limitative, les garanties afférentes à la qualité et la compatibilité du Service à un usage spécifique et à la non-violation des règles d'utilisation du Service par ses utilisateurs.
b) RTL ne garantit pas que :
le Service répondra parfaitement à vos attentes
le Service sera ininterrompu (ou accessible), opportun, sûr ou dépourvu de toute erreur
les résultats qui peuvent être obtenus en utilisant le Service seront exacts et fiables
la qualité de tous produits, services, informations ou toute autre matériel obtenu par vous sur le Service seront à la hauteur de vos attentes, et
les défauts dans les logiciels utilisés, s'il en existe, feront l'objet d'une correction
c) Tous matériels téléchargés ou obtenus de toute autre manière lors de l'utilisation du Service sont à vos propres risques et périls.
d) Aucun conseil et aucune information, qu'ils soient oraux ou écrits, obtenus par vous de RTL ou lors de l'utilisation du Service ne sont susceptibles de créer des garanties non expressément prévues par le présent accord.
15. Limitation de responsabilité
Vous reconnaissez et acceptez que, dans toute la mesure permise par la réglementation en vigueur, RTL ne pourra être tenu pour responsable de tout dommage direct ou indirect en ce y compris notamment les pertes de profits, de clientèle, de données ou toute autre perte de biens incorporels (et ce même si RTL a été informé de la potentialité de tels dommages) pouvant survenir :
de l'utilisation ou au contraire l'impossibilité d'utiliser le Service,
de coûts pouvant survenir du fait de l'acquisition de biens ou de services de substitution résultant de l'achat de biens ou de services ou à des transactions survenues lors de l'utilisation du Service,
suite à un accès non autorisé au Service par un utilisateur ou à la modification de vos propres données,
de toute autre question en rapport avec le Service.
16. Notifications
Toute notification pourra vous être adressée par e-mail ou par courrier postal. RTL se réserve également la possibilité de modifier les présentes Conditions d'Utilisation du Service en plaçant directement sur le Service des notifications de changement ou des liens vers de telles notifications.
17. Informations afférentes aux marques déposées
rtl.lu ; le logo RTL, la présentation graphique du site, les jeux, les services complémentaires radio et télévision, ainsi que tout autre matériel (images, photos, textes, sons, vidéos, messages, … ) (ci-après collectivement dénommées les " Marques RTL ") sont des marques déposées propriété de RTL.
Sans autorisation expresse de RTL, vous vous engagez à ne pas utiliser ou diffuser de quelque manière que ce soit les Marques RTL.
18. Droit de propriété intellectuelle
RTL respecte les droits de propriété intellectuelle d'autrui et demande à ses utilisateurs d'en faire autant. Si vous avez de bonnes raisons de croire que vos données ont été utilisées d'une manière susceptible de porter atteinte à vos droits tels que reconnus par la législation européenne en vigueur, merci d'en informer RTL en matière de propriété intellectuelle en nous fournissant les informations suivantes :
la signature électronique ou " physique " de la personne habilitée à agir pour le compte du titulaire des données,
une description de l'œuvre que vous considérez comme ayant été violée,
la localisation sur le site du matériel ayant fait l'objet du litige,
une déclaration sur l'honneur dans laquelle vous reconnaissez n'avoir pas connaissance que l'utilisation a été autorisée par le titulaire ou son représentant,
une déclaration sur l'honneur, susceptible d'entraîner des pénalités et des poursuites pour parjure, reconnaissant que les informations correspondant aux points listés ci-dessus sont exactes et que vous êtes titulaire de droit ou habilité à représenter ce dernier.
19. Droit à l'information
Pour toute question concernant la protection ou le traitement de vos données, nous vous invitons à bien vouloir consulter notre
politique en matière de protection des données
ou à nous contacter à l'adresse suivante:
privacy@rtl.lu
20. OneSignal
RTL utilise une plateforme d'envoi de message "Push" dans ses applications de la société OneSignal, Inc.
Cette plateforme prend en charge l'envoi de messages courts sur les applications. A ce propos, les préférences de réception ainsi qu'un identifiant unique à l’application en tant que telle sont sauvegardés durant l'utilisation de ce service.
21. Jeux SMS "Premium"
RTL attire l'attention de toute personne participant à ses jeux sur le fait que les SMS de participation peuvent être payants selon un tarif supérieur au tarif d'un SMS régulier. RTL incite dès lors tous ses participants à faire preuve de prudence et de modération dans la fréquence des SMS envoyés. RTL se réserve le droit de limiter le nombre de SMS qu'un participant peut envoyer et/ou d'exclure les SMS de tout participant au-delà d'un nombre de messages fixé par RTL de manière non-discriminatoire. La participation à de tels jeux est réservée aux personnes de 16 ans ou plus.
Toute personne n'ayant pas gagné peut demander le remboursement des frais d'envoi du/des SMS de participation à hauteur d'un plafond de 0.50.- € par envoi. Ne sont pris en considération que les messages envoyés pendant la durée où le jeu était en cours et la participation ouverte. Pour demander le remboursement, vous devez vous présenter au siège de RTL, pendant les heures de bureau (jours ouvrables entre 09.00 et 17.00 heures) avec la preuve de votre envoi (éléments envoyés du téléphone et/ou la facture correspondante identifiant le/les SMS concernés de votre prestataire mobile). En remboursant les frais, RTL demandera la signature d'une quittance de remboursement et l'effacement de la preuve d'envoi sur le téléphone. Aucun remboursement ne pourra avoir lieu au-delà d'un délai de 15 jours ouvrables après la fin du jeu concerné.
22. Jeux et concours
Les collaborateurs de CLT-UFA, RTL Group, CLT-UFA International, BCE, ENEX, Media Assurances, IP ainsi que les membres de leurs familles en ligne directe (ascendants, descendants) sont exclus de la participation aux jeux et concours organisés sur les antennes de RTL, RTL Radio Lëtzebuerg, RTL Télé Lëtzebuerg ainsi que sur RTL.lu.
Gains
RTL se réserve le droit, dans le cadre de ses jeux et actions commerciales ou non, de remplacer tout cadeau annoncé par un lot d’une valeur équivalente. Si RTL n’est pas en mesure de fournir le cadeau annoncé pour quelque cause que ce soit, la responsabilité de RTL ne peut être engagée. Aucune contrepartie ou équivalent financier ne pourra être réclamé par le gagnant.
RTL ou ses partenaires se chargeront de transmettre aux gagnants les cadeaux dans un délai de 3 (trois) mois à compter de la date de la clôture des jeux et actions.
RTL se réserve le droit de publier les noms des gagnants, sans y être obligé.
En cas d’envoi, RTL ne peut être rendu responsable pour toute avarie, vol ou perte intervenu lors de la livraison des cadeaux.
Chaque cadeau retourné après son envoi par courrier, courriel, ou toute autre forme d’envoi au gagnant et qui ne serait pas réclamé dans le mois suivant sera perdu pour le participant.
De même, tout lot à retirer qui ne serait pas réclamé par le gagnant dans les délais de 1 (un) mois sera définitivement perdu et ce sans contestation ni réclamation possible de la part du gagnant.
24. Photos événementielles sur nos sites
Si vous vous trouvez sur une photo publiée sur nos sites et que vous souhaitez demander la suppression de celle-ci, nous vous prions d’envoyer un message à privacy@rtl.lu en indiquant vos nom, adresse email, raison ainsi que l’adresse directe vers la photo en question sur notre site.
Après vérification de la recevabilité de votre demande, nos services procéderont, dans un délai raisonnable, à la suppression de la photo sur notre site. Nous ne pouvons pourtant pas garantir que la photo en question a été reprise sur un autre site ou média hors des produits RTL.
25. Droit applicable et tribunaux compétents
Par l’utilisation de nos Sites internet, vous acceptez que l’ensemble de leur contenu soit exclusivement régi par le droit luxembourgeois et interprété conformément à celui-ci. Seuls les tribunaux luxembourgeois sont compétents en cas de litige relatif à ces Sites ou à leur utilisation.
Charte des utilisateurs des forums de discussion du portail internet d'RTL
La présente charte contient les règles de comportement obligatoires au respect desquelles est soumise toute participation au Forum de RTL, et ce sans égard quant au sujet de discussion, au caractère permanent ou non ou modéré ou non du ou des forum(s) ou « chat room(s) » concerné(s).
Ce Forum constitue un point d’entrée unique à un ou plusieurs forum(s) de discussion et des « chat rooms » ou d’autres applications de discussion et d’échange.
Ces conditions d’utilisation peuvent être spécifiées pour la participation à des applications faisant partie du Forum, telles que des « chat rooms » ou des « blogs ».
Accès et inscription
Ce Forum peut être lu par quiconque. Pour y contribuer, il vous sera demandé de vous inscrire en indiquant votre nom ou en choisissant un pseudonyme (si vous préférez être identifié ainsi vis-à-vis des autres participants) et de saisir une adresse de courrier électronique.
L’adresse de courrier électronique que vous devez fournir doit impérativement être une adresse email valable, valide et unique, dont l’utilisateur est le titulaire. Une inscription avec une adresse de courrier électronique dite « jetable » / « temporaire », aura comme conséquence le refus de toute publication de vos commentaires.
Cette inscription permet :
aux autres participants de reconnaître vos diverses contributions, personnalisant ainsi le débat sans pour autant révéler votre identité réelle,
à tout participant de vous contacter personnellement sans dévoiler votre adresse de courrier électronique.
RTL se réserve le droit de prendre des mesures d’exclusion avec effet immédiat, temporaires ou permanentes à l’égard de tout participant au Forum ou à l’une quelconque des applications de celui-ci, lorsque, du seul avis de RTL, le participant enfreint les règles du Forum ou fait état d’un comportement de nature à mettre en danger la sérénité des communications sur le Forum ou les règles qui le régissent. RTL se réserve par ailleurs le droit d’agir en justice ou de s’associer à toute action tendant à faire respecter les règles régissant le présent Forum ou d’obtenir réparation du dommage causé par une infraction à ces règles.
Droits et devoirs du lecteur
Tout lecteur de ce Forum doit respecter les droits de propriété intellectuelle ainsi que les droits personnels des auteurs. Il doit notamment veiller à ne pas reproduire et diffuser les contributions publiées sur ce Forum sur d’autres forums ou d’autres supports sans l’accord de leurs auteurs.
Tout lecteur peut néanmoins reproduire le contenu de ce Forum à des fins de consultation privée ou reproduire et diffuser de courts extraits d’un message, à des fins d’information ou de recherche, en citant le nom de ce Forum et celui de l’auteur du message (nom réel ou pseudonyme).
Il ne procédera pas, sur un autre forum, à un dénigrement, quelle qu’en soit la forme, des contenus ou contributions publiés sur le Forum ou de l’un quelconque des auteurs. Il ne révèlera pas l’identité de l’un quelconque des participants au Forum et dont il aurait eu connaissance par quelque moyen que ce soit, sauf sur demande expresse du modérateur ou de l’hébergeur du Forum ou avec l’autorisation de la personne concernée.
Droits et devoirs du contributeur
Tout contributeur demeure propriétaire de son message et des droits de propriété intellectuelle qui y sont attachés. Cependant, si vous deviez décider de vous désinscrire du Forum pour quelque motif que ce soit, l’éventuelle suppression de vos messages est laissée à la seule appréciation du modérateur ou de l’hébergeur du Forum, sans que cette discrétion ne puisse s’interpréter comme une appropriation de vos messages par le modérateur ou l’hébergeur.
Les propos tenus sur ce Forum sont néanmoins publiés sous la seule responsabilité de leurs auteurs. A ce titre, vous devez respecter les lois et règlements en vigueur et le droit des personnes. Par exemple, vous ne devez pas diffuser des messages violents, injurieux, diffamatoires, racistes, révisionnistes, faisant l’apologie des crimes de guerre, pédophiles, appelant au meurtre ou incitant au suicide, incitant à la discrimination ou à la haine ou dont le contenu reproduirait sans autorisation une œuvre protégée par la propriété intellectuelle (ex. articles de presse, message d’un tiers).
A ce titre, ni une éventuelle modération a priori ou a posteriori, ni la suppression de messages, quel qu’en soit le motif, ni leur modification ne pourra s’interpréter comme une appropriation par RTL des termes ou contenus du ou encore des opinions exprimées dans le ou les message(s) concerné(s) par ces mesures. A aucun moment RTL n’assumera de responsabilité éditoriale à l’égard des contenus publiés dans le cadre du Forum.
Veillez par ailleurs à respecter la courtoisie nécessaire au bon déroulement des débats.
Modération
Ce Forum est modéré a priori c’est-à-dire que tous les messages sont lus avant leur publication. Un délai peut donc s’écouler avant qu’un message ne soit rendu public.
Le modérateur s'assure que votre contribution porte bien sur le thème de débat traité dans le Forum, respecte les lois et règlements en vigueur et qu'elle permet un débat constructif. Il se réserve notamment la possibilité de refuser la publication des messages redondants, de nature publicitaire ou promotionnelle, contraires à l’ordre public ou aux bonnes mœurs, violents, racistes, révisionnistes, faisant l’apologie des crimes de guerre, injurieux ou grossiers, contraires aux droits d’auteur ou droits voisins, au droit applicable aux bases de données, au droit des marques, au droit à l’image, au droit au respect de la vie privée ou qui enfreindraient toute autre disposition législative ou réglementaire en vigueur.
Tout message publié demeure néanmoins sous la responsabilité de son auteur.
Les lecteurs peuvent demander la vérification de tout message litigieux posté sur ce Forum en contactant le modérateur à l’adresse suivante : [comments@rtl.lu & lieserbreif@rtl.lu]. Ils pourront à la même adresse faire part au modérateur d’incidents survenus dans le cadre du Forum et qui sont de nature à enfreindre ou à mettre en danger les règles applicables à la partie du forum concerné.
Vu l’afflux quotidien de réactions aux différents éléments publiés, le modérateur se réserve le droit de ne pas avoir l’obligation de répondre aux différentes remarques individuelles qui sont envoyées.
Merci de votre compréhension.
Modification des messages
La rédaction se réserve le droit de modifier et/ou supprimer tout contenu d'un message qui lui semblerait manifestement en contradiction avec les lois et règlements en vigueur. Le message modifié et publié reste néanmoins toujours sous la responsabilité de son auteur.
Prière d'éviter d'utiliser "[...]", réservé à la rédaction pour marquer qu'une partie du commentaire a été laissée de côté.
Référencement des messages
Nous attirons expressément votre attention sur le fait que les contributions publiées dans le Forum de RTL sont susceptibles d’être référencées par un moteur de recherche et que vos contributions publiées sont dès lors également susceptibles d’être référencées par ces moteurs de recherche et sont accessibles à tout moment sur Internet via le site rtl.lu.
Destination des données collectées et des messages archivés
Ce Forum détient et conserve toutes données de nature à permettre l’identification des auteurs des messages et procède à l’archivage privé des messages postés. Ces informations ne pourront être communiquées qu’à une autorité judiciaire administrative ou de police habilitée à cet effet. RTL coopérera avec toute demande en ce sens des autorités, dans le but de garantir la sérénité des échanges et le respect des présentes règles sur le Forum.
Le contenu des messages pourra également être communiqué, de manière exceptionnelle et après anonymisation, à un organisme de recherche scientifique ou universitaire.
Néanmoins, RTL se réserve le droit de vous contacter si RTL avait besoin de votre aide ou/et de votre témoignage dans le cadre d’un reportage télévisé ou radiophonique. Toutefois, votre anonymat sera garanti, selon les dispositions en vigueur quant à la loi de la protection des sources du journaliste ("Quelleschutz").
Protection des données personnelles
Conformément aux Règlement (UE) 2016/679 du Parlement Européen et du Conseil du 27 avril 2016 relatif à la protection des personnes physiques à l’égard du traitement des données à caractère personnel et à la libre circulation de ces données, et abrogeant la directive 95/46/CE (règlement général sur la protection des données) , vous disposez d'un droit d'accès, de modification, de rectification et de suppression des données qui vous concernent.
Vous pouvez exercer ce droit en envoyant un message à : [
privacy@rtl.lu
]
ou en adressant un courrier à :
RTL newMedia Luxembourg
Conc. : données personnelles - Accès
43, boulevard Pierre Frieden
L-1543 Luxembourg
Politique en matière de protection des données
La présente politique vous informe sur le traitement de vos données à caractère personnel en relation avec le site et les sous-sites de rtl.lu (ci-après « notre site ») et les jeux-concours à la radio ainsi que sur les droits qui s’offrent à vous à cet égard conformément au Règlement général sur la protection des données (UE) 2016/679 (
RGPD
).
Cette politique est faite au nom de :
CLT-UFA S.A. Division RTL NewMedia Luxembourg
43 bd Pierre Frieden
L-1543 Luxembourg
(ci-après « nous »)
1. Traitements concernés
Dans cette partie, nous vous informons sur les différents traitements de données effectués en relation avec notre site, y compris leurs finalités, leur base juridique, la durée de conservation de vos données ainsi que sur les conséquences éventuelles de la non-fourniture de vos données. Le cas échéant, nous vous informons également sur les destinataires ou les catégories de destinataires de vos données ainsi que sur garanties mises en place pour les transferts de données en-dehors de l’Espace économique européen. Si nous n’avons pas obtenu vos données directement de vous-même, nous vous informons également sur les sources de vos données.
Etant donné que le traitement de vos données à caractère personnel dépend de vos interaction avec notre site et les services qui s’y rapportent, il est possible toutes les parties de la présente Politique en matière de protection des données ne s’applique pas à vous.
1.1 Cookies et technologies similaires
Notre site contient des cookies et technologies similaires, y compris de tiers, pour assurer le bon fonctionnement du site, améliorer votre expérience, analyser et améliorer l’impact de notre site et pour vous proposer des publicités personnalisées. Pour plus d’informations sur l’utilisation de cookies sur notre site et les options qui s’offrent à vous à cet égard, nous vous prions de bien vouloir consulter notre
Politique en matière de cookies
.
1.2 Votre compte
Nous vous offrons la possibilité de créer un compte sur notre site. Le traitement des données liées à votre compte est nécessaire pour vous fournir un compte et les fonctionnalités correspondantes sur base de l’exécution du contrat qui s’applique lorsque vous utilisez nos services (article 6(1)(b) du RGPD). Sur base de notre intérêt légitime de sécuriser note site, nous vous demandons de nous fournir un numéro de téléphone pour protéger votre compte contre des tentatives de piratage ou autre accès non autorisé.
Lorsque vous optez de vous inscrire avec votre Apple-ID, nous recevons de la part de Apple votre nom et votre adresse email. Lorsque vous optez de vous inscrire avec votre compte Facebook, nous recevons de la part de Facebook votre nom, votre adresse email et votre photo profile. Lorsque vous optez de vous inscrire avec votre compte Google, nous recevons de la part de Google votre nom, votre adresse email, votre choix de langue et votre photo profile. Pour plus d’informations le traitement de vos données effectué par ces différents fournisseurs, veuillez-vous référer directement aux politiques en matière de protection des données de ces différents fournisseurs.
Aux fins décrites ci-dessus, nous conservons les données liées à votre compte pour la durée que vous maintenez votre compte. Vous pouvez modifier certaines des données liées à votre compte ou supprimer votre compte directement dans
Centre de confidentialité
correspondant à votre compte.
Les champs marqués par un astérisque dans le formulaire d’inscription ainsi que votre numéro de téléphone pour sécuriser votre compte sont des données obligatoires. Sans la fourniture de ces données, vous ne pouvez pas créer de compte sur notre site.
1.3 Vos commentaires et publications sur notre site
Si vous placez un commentaire ou effectuez une publication, nous traitons vos données pour garantir la publication effective de votre commentaire ou publication sur base de l’exécution du contrat qui s’applique lorsque vous utilisez nos services (article 6(1)(b) du RGPD). Sur base de notre intérêt légitime de modérer le contenu sur notre site, nous traitons vos données en relation avec votre publication pour nous assurer que celle-ci est conforme à nos
Conditions d’utilisation
(article 6(1)(f) du RGPD).
À cette fin, nous conservons vos données en relation avec vos commentaires ou publications pour la durée que votre commentaire ou publication est accessible en ligne ou jusqu’à ce que vous supprimez votre compte.
Sans la fourniture de vos données, nous ne pouvons pas publier votre commentaire ou publication.
1.4 Newsletters/Services SMS/Messages Push
Nous proposons différents services qui vous permettent de rester informé des dernières actualités. Vous pouvez vous abonner à notre
newsletter par email
, à nos différents
services SMS
ou encore à nos messages « push » via notre application mobile. Pour la fourniture de ces services, nous traitons vos données à caractère personnel sur base de l’exécution du contrat sous-jacent (article 6(1)(b) du RGPD).
Sur base de votre consentement (article 6(1)(a) du RGPD), nous pouvons également traiter vos données pour faire de la publicité pour nos services ou ceux de nos partenaires, y compris des concours, conseils et promotions, par le biais de newsletters, SMS ou messages « push ».
Nous conservons vos données à cet effet jusqu’à ce que vous désactivez le service en question ou retirez votre consentement.
Pour l’envoi de messages « push », nous utilisons les services de OneSignal, une société située en Californie aux États-Unis. Le transfert de vos données vers OneSignal repose sur des Clauses Contractuelles Types telles qu’adoptées par la Commission européen.
Pour l’envoi de SMS, nous utilisons les services de la société luxembourgeoise mPulse, qui fait le relai entre nous et les opérateurs télécom.
Sans la fourniture de vos données, vous ne bénéficierez pas des services en question.
1.5 Jeux/Concours/Quiz
Lorsque vous participez à des jeux/concours/quiz via notre site ou par tout autre moyen, par exemple par SMS, nous traitons vos données pour vous inscrire en tant que participant, déterminer un (les) gagnant(s) et, le cas échéant, permettre aux différents partenaires de remettre leur prix au(x) gagnant(s). À cette fin, nous effectuons le traitement de vos données sur base du contrat qui s’applique lorsque vous participez à de tels jeux/concours/quiz (article 6(1)(b) du RGPD). Nous traitons vos données de participation également dans notre intérêt légitime de garantir des conditions de participation équitables pour tout le monde et d’éviter les abus (article 6(1)(f) du RGDP)
Vos données recueillis lors de l’inscription seront communiquées aux différents partenaires uniquement au cas où vous figurez parmi le(s) gagnant(s). Dans certains cas, nous vous remettons le prix directement en mains propres, sans partager vos informations avec le partenaire du jeux/concours/quiz.
À ces fins, nous conservons vos données de participation jusqu’à ce que le prix a été retiré ou au plus jusqu’à 1 an après la fin du jeu/concours/quiz en question.
Sans la fourniture de vos données, vous ne pouvez pas participer au jeu/concours/quiz en question.
1.6 Photos
Nous pouvons publier sur notre site des photos sur lesquelles vous êtes représenté. De manière générale, nous ne publions pas de photos de vous sans votre consentement (article 6(1)(a) du RGPD). Nous considérons notamment comme un acte positif clair valant consentement le fait que vous posez pour une photo prise par un de nos photographes.
Dans certains cas, cependant, nous nous reposons sur notre intérêt légitime ainsi que celui de l’auteur et de nos lecteurs pour l’exercice du droit fondamental à la liberté d’expression et de l